Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-627.01
Licensees;
maintain written veterinary care plan or written emergency veterinary care
plan.

A dealer or pet shop licensed under section
54-627 shall maintain a written veterinary care plan developed in conjunction
with the attending veterinarian for the dealer or pet shop. An animal control
facility, an animal rescue, an
animal shelter, or a boarding kennel licensed under section 54-627 shall maintain
a written emergency veterinary care plan.

Laws 2009, LB241, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB910, § 7.